North Carolina, session 2025, HB160.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The University of North Carolina School of Medicine's Area Health
Education Centers (NC AHEC) shall consult with the North Carolina Medical Board, North
Carolina Department of Health and Human Services, North Carolina Medical Society, North
Carolina Pediatric Society, North Carolina Academy of Family Physicians, North Carolina Board
of Nursing, North Carolina Board of Pharmacy, and the North Carolina Nurses Association to
gather evidence-based information on sudden unexpected death in epilepsy from publications
and nonprofit organizations to create standard information to provide to all health care
practitioners in this State. The information shall include, at a minimum, current and
evidence-based information about sudden unexpected death in epilepsy risk factors and
conditions and contact information for nonprofit organizations that provide support services for
epilepsy conditions. The information shall be made available on NC AHEC's website and readily
accessible to health care practitioners in this State. No later than September 1, 2025, NC AHEC
shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services a
completed summary or booklet of information provided to health care practitioners in the report.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H160-v-1*